Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5795.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 558a. (1) In addition to filing an affidavit of identity under section 558, if a candidate files a nominating petition, qualifying petition, or filing fee for a county office, that candidate shall file with the county clerk of that county an affidavit, in a form as prescribed by the secretary of state, that indicates whether the candidate has ever been convicted of a felony. A candidate who files an affidavit under this subsection is not required to indicate a conviction for a felony that has been expunged or set aside, or for which the candidate has been pardoned. (2) If, after filing an affidavit under subsection (1), a candidate for a county office is convicted of a felony, that candidate shall, not later than 3 business days after the date the candidate is convicted of a felony, update the affidavit filed with the county clerk under subsection (1). (3) As used in this section: (a) "Convicted of a felony" means a court has entered a judgment of conviction for a felony offense, regardless of whether sentencing has occurred or whether there is an appeal pending. (b) "County office" means any of the following: (i) An office named in section 191. (ii) The office of county commissioner. (iii) The office of county executive.